bg-BG: Превозни средства и части > Автомобилни части и аксесоари > Багажници и товарни отделения за превозни средства: Мрежи за багаж за моторни превозни средства; Аксесоари за багажник за моторни превозни средства; Багажни стойки за моторни превозни средства; Рампи за товарене за моторни превозни средства; Ремаркета за моторни превозни средства; Чанти и кошове за мотоциклети; Кутии и органайзери за товарно отделение на камиони; Закачалки и кукички за облегалки за глава на превозни средства; Органайзери за превозни средства
en: Vehicles & Parts > Vehicle Parts & Accessories > Vehicle Storage & Cargo: Motor Vehicle Cargo Nets; Motor Vehicle Carrying Rack Accessories; Motor Vehicle Carrying Racks; Motor Vehicle Loading Ramps; Motor Vehicle Trailers; Motorcycle Bags & Panniers; Truck Bed Storage Boxes & Organizers; Vehicle Headrest Hangers & Hooks; Vehicle Organizers
it: Veicoli e parti > Componenti e accessori per auto > Stoccaggio e carico per veicoli: Reti carico per veicoli a motore; Accessori per rastrelliere per veicoli a motore; Portapacchi per veicoli a motore; Rampe di carico per veicoli a motore; Rimorchi per veicoli a motore; Borse e zaini da moto; Divisori e contenitori per cassoni; Appendiabiti e ganci per poggiatesta per veicoli; Organizzazione degli spazi dei veicoli
da: Køretøjer og dele > Dele og tilbehør til køretøjer > Lagring og last til køretøjer: Bagagenet til motorkøretøjer; Tilbehør til holder til tagboks til motorkøretøjer; Holder til tagboks til motorkøretøjer; Læsseramper til motorkøretøjer; Trailere til motorkøretøjer; Tasker og sidetasker til motorcykler; Opbevaringsbokse og -organisering til senge i lastbiler; Bøjler og kroge til nakkestøtter i biler; Opbevaringssystemer til motorkøretøjer
ko: 차량/부품 > 차량 부품/부대용품 > 차량 보관/화물: 자동차 포장망; 자동차용 캐리어 부대용품; 자동차용 캐리어; 자동차 적재 램프; 자동차 트레일러; 오토바이 가방/짐칸; 트럭 화물칸 보관함/정리함; 차량 머리 받침대 행어/고리; 차량 정리함
pt-BR: Veículos e peças > Peças e acessórios de veículos > Armazenamento e carga de veículos: Redes de carga para veículos motorizados; Acessórios para racks de transporte para veículos motorizados; Racks de transporte para veículos motorizados; Rampas de carregamento para veículos motorizados; Trailers motorizados; Bolsas e mochilas para motociclistas; Caixas e organizadores para caçamba; Cabides e ganchos para encosto de cabeça; Organizadores para veículos
fi: Ajoneuvot ja osat > Ajoneuvojen osat ja tarvikkeet > Auton säilytys- ja kuormaratkaisut: Moottoriajoneuvon kuormaverkot; Moottoriajoneuvon tavaratelineiden lisätarvikkeet; Moottoriajoneuvojen tavaratelineet; Moottoriajoneuvon lastausrampit; Ajoneuvon trailerit; Moottoripyörälaukut ja moottoripyörän sivulaukut; Kuorma-auton sängynsäilytyslaatikot ja -ratkaisut; Auton niskatukiripustimet ja -koukut; Ajoneuvon säilytysratkaisut
ro-RO: Vehicule și piese > Piese și accesorii pentru vehicule > Depozitare și încărcătură pentru vehicule: Plase de marfă pentru autovehicule; Accesorii suport transport pentru autovehicule; Suporturi transport pentru autovehicule; Rampe de încărcare autovehicule; Remorci autovehicule; Genți de șa și genți de transport pentru motociclete; Cutii și organizatoare pentru depozitare pentru platou camion; Umerașe și cârlige tetieră vehicul; Organizatoare vehicul
ru: Транспортные средства, запчасти и аксессуары > Запчасти и аксессуары для транспортных средств > Товары для перевозки грузов на транспортных средствах: Сетки для багажников автомобилей; Аксессуары для конструкций для перевозки багажа; Конструкции для перевозки багажа; Погрузочные трапы для автомобилей; Автомобильные прицепы; Мотоциклетные сумки и кофры; Ящики и органайзеры для кузова пикапа; Вешалки и крючки для подголовников транспортных средств; Органайзеры для транспортных средств
sl-SI: Vozila in deli > Deli in dodatki za vozila > Shranjevanje tovora in opreme v vozilih: Mreže za tovor za motorna vozila; Dodatki za nosilce za vozila; Nosilci za vozila; Nakladalne rampe za motorna vozila; Prikolice za motorna vozila; Torbe in prtljažniki za motorna kolesa; Škatle za shranjevanje in organizatorji za tovorni prostor; Obešalniki in kljuke za naslonjala za glavo vozila; Organizatorji za vozila
pl: Pojazdy i części > Akcesoria i części do pojazdów > Przewóz i przechowywanie bagażu: Siatki bagażowe; Akcesoria do bagażników bazowych; Bagażniki samochodowe; Rampy do załadunku; Przyczepy; Sakwy i torby motocyklowe; Pojemniki i sortowniki do skrzyń ładunkowych; Wieszaki na zagłówek; Organizatory samochodowe
lt-LT: Transporto priemonės ir dalys > Transporto priemonių dalys ir priedai > Transporto priemonių krovinių įranga: Motorinių transporto priemonių krovinių tinklai; Motorinių transporto priemonių laikiklių priedai; Motorinių transporto priemonių laikikliai; Motorinių transporto priemonių pakrovimo rampos; Motorinių transporto priemonių priekabos; Motociklų krepšiai ir balnakrepšiai; Daiktų dėžės ir laikikliai sunkvežimių priekaboms; Transporto priemonių galvos atramų pakabos ir kabliukai; Transporto priemonių daiktų laikikliai
sv: Fordon och delar > Fordonsdelar och tillbehör > Lastförvaring i fordon: Lastnät för motorfordon; Tillbehör till lasthållare för fordon; Lasthållare för fordon; Lastrampar för fordon; Släpvagnar för motorfordon; Motorcykelväskor; Förvaringsboxar för lastbilsflak; Nackstödshängare och -krokar; Förvaring inuti fordon
fr: Véhicules et accessoires > Pièces détachées pour véhicules > Accessoires de chargement: Filets de transport pour véhicules motorisés; Accessoires de barre de toit pour véhicules motorisés; Coffres de toit pour voitures; Rampes de chargement; Remorques de voiture; Sacoches et panniers pour moto; Boîtes de rangement de benne; Crochets d’appuie-têtes; Rangements pour véhicules
nb: Kjøretøy og deler > Deler og tilbehør til kjøretøy > Billagring og -last: Lastenett for bil; Lastestativtilbehør til kjøretøy; Lastestativer for kjøretøy; Lasteramper for kjøretøy; Tilhengere for kjøretøy; Motorsykkelvesker; Lagringsbokser og organisering for lasteplan; Hengere og kroker for hodestøtter i bil; Bilorganisering
cs: Vozidla a náhradní díly > Díly a příslušenství vozidel > Přeprava nákladů pomocí vozidel: Sítě na náklad; Příslušenství k nosičům pro vozidla; Nosiče pro motorová vozidla; Nakládací rampy pro vozidla; Přívěsy k motorovým vozidlům; Tašky a nosiče na motorky; Úložné boxy a organizéry na korby a valníky; Věšáky a háčky na opěrky hlavy; Organizéry do vozidel
ja: 乗り物・パーツ > 乗り物用パーツ・関連用品 > 乗り物用収納ボックス: 自動車・バイク用カーゴネット; 車載用ラック・キャリア関連用品; 車載用ラック・キャリア; 車両積載用スロープ; トレーラー; バイク用バッグ・パニア; トラック荷台用収納ボックス; ヘッドレストハンガー・フック; カーシートオーガナイザー
sk-SK: Diely pre vozidlá > Diely a príslušenstvo pre vozidlá > Riešenia uloženia nákladu na vozidle: Nákladné siete motorových vozidiel; Príslušenstvo pre nosiče motorových vozidiel; Nosiče motorových vozidiel; Nájazdové rampy motorových vozidiel; Prívesy pre motorové vozidlá; Tašky a brašne na motocykel; Úložné boxy a organizéry do nákladného priestoru; Vešiaky a háky na opierky hlavy; Organizéry vo vozidle
tr: Taşıtlar ve Parçalar > Taşıt Parçaları ve Aksesuarlar > Taşıt Saklama ve Kargo: Motorlu Taşıt Taşıma Ağları; Motorlu Taşıt Taşıma Ekipmanı Aksesuarları; Motorlu Taşıt Taşıma Ekipmanları; Motorlu Taşıt Yükleme Rampaları; Motorlu Taşıt Römorkları; Motosiklet Çantaları ve Bagaj Çantaları; Kamyon Kasası Saklama Kutuları ve Düzenleyicileri; Taşıt Koltuk Başlığı Askıları ve Kancaları; Araç Düzenleyicileri
hr-HR: Vozila i dijelovi vozila > Dijelovi i oprema za vozila > Skladištenje i teret vozila: Mreže za teret za motorna vozila; Dodaci za nosače za motorna vozila; Nosači za motorna vozila; Rampe za utovar motornih vozila; Prikolice za motorna vozila; Torbe i košare za motocikle; Kutije i organizatori za pohranu za krevete za kamione; Vješalice i kuke za naslone za glavu za vozila; Organizatori za vozila
zh-CN: 交通工具/汽车/飞机/船舶 > 交通工具零件/配件 > 交通工具储存和载货: 汽车行李网; 车顶架配件; 汽车承载架; 机动车装载斜坡; 汽车拖车; 摩托车驮包/马鞍包; 卡车车厢储物箱和收纳盒; 汽车头枕挂钩; 汽车内收纳
el: Οχήματα & ανταλλακτικά > Ανταλλακτικά & αξεσουάρ οχημάτων > Αποθήκευση & φορτίο οχημάτων: Δίχτυα φορτίου μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Αξεσουάρ ραφιών μεταφοράς μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Σχάρες μεταφοράς μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Ράμπες φόρτωσης για μηχανοκίνητα οχήματα; Τρέιλερ μηχανοκίνητων οχημάτων; Τσάντες & πλαϊνές βαλίτσες μοτοσικλετών; Κουτιά αποθήκευσης και οργανωτές για καρότσες φορτηγών; Κρεμάστρες και γάντζοι προσκέφαλων οχημάτων; Οργανωτές οχημάτων
th: รถยนต์และชิ้นส่วน > ชิ้นส่วนและอุปกรณ์สำหรับยานยนต์ > ที่จัดเก็บและบรรทุกของบนรถ: ตาข่ายใส่ของสำหรับยานยนต์; อุปกรณ์ชั้นวางของสำหรับยานพาหนะ; แร็คบรรทุกของบนรถ; สะพานโหลดยานพาหนะ; แร็คติดรถยนต์; กระเป๋าและถุงใส่ของสำหรับจักรยานยนต์; กล่องและที่เก็บท้ายรถบรรทุก; ที่เกี่ยวและแขวนของหลังพนักพิง; ที่จัดระเบียบในรถยนต์
hu: Járművek és alkatrészek > Járműalkatrészek és -kiegészítők > Járműtárolás és -rakomány: Gépjármű-rakományhálók; Gépjárműhordozóállvány-kiegészítők; Gépjárműállvány-kiegészítők; Gépjármű-rakodórámpák; Gépjármű-utánfutók; Motorkerékpár-táskák és -oldaltáskák; Teherautóplató-tárolódobozok és -rendezők; Járműfejtámla-akasztók és -horgok; Járműszervezők
es: Vehículos y recambios > Piezas y accesorios para vehículos > Almacenamiento y carga de vehículos: Redes de carga para vehículos motorizados; Accesorios para portaequipajes de vehículos motorizados; Portaequipajes para vehículos motorizados; Rampas de carga para vehículos motorizados; Remolques para vehículos motorizados; Bolsas y maletas para motocicletas; Cajas de almacenamiento y organizadores para plataformas de camión; Colgadores y ganchos para reposacabezas de vehículos; Organizadores de vehículos
de: Fahrzeuge & Teile > Fahrzeugersatzteile & -zubehör > Stauraum- & Transportsysteme: Kfz-Ladenetze; Kfz-Gepäckträgerzubehör; Kfz-Gepäckträger; Laderampen; Kfz-Anhänger; Motorradtaschen & -koffer; Boxen & Sortiersysteme für Ladeflächen; Bügel & Haken für Kopfstützen; Utensilientaschen fürs Auto
pt-PT: Veículos e peças > Acessórios e peças para veículos > Armazenamento e carga de veículos: Redes de carga para veículos motorizados; Acessórios de suportes de carga para veículos motorizados; Suportes de carga para veículos motorizados; Rampas de carregamento para veículos motorizados; Atrelados para veículos motorizados; Malas e bolsas para motas; Organizadores e caixas de arrumação para mala de carrinha; Ganchos e cabides de apoios para cabeça de veículos; Organizadores para veículos
nl: Voertuigen en onderdelen > Voertuigonderdelen en -accessoires > Opslag en lading voor voertuigen: Bagagenetten voor motorvoertuigen; Draagrekaccessoires voor motorvoertuigen; Dragers voor motorvoertuigen; Laadplatforms voor motorvoertuigen; Aanhangwagens voor motorvoertuigen; Motortassen en -manden; Opslagcontainers en -organizers voor open laadbakken; Hoofdsteunhangers en -haken voor voertuigen; Organizers voor voertuigen
zh-TW: 車輛與零配件 > 車輛零件/配件 > 車輛收納空間/載貨車廂: 機動車輛吊貨網; 汽機車攜帶架配件; 汽機車攜車架; 車用裝卸升降板; 露營拖車; 機車馬鞍袋; 尾箱收納用品; 車用椅背掛勾; 車用置物收納
vi: Xe và phụ tùng > Bộ phận và phụ kiện xe cộ > Khoang lưu giữ và chở hàng của xe: Lưới treo dùng cho xe máy; Phụ kiện cho ray để đồ ở xe máy; Giá chở đồ cho xe cơ giới; Thang dẫn xe cơ giới; Moóc kéo xe; Túi và thùng cho xe máy; Ngăn và hộp thùng chứa xe tải; Móc và móc treo gối đầu trong xe; Túi đựng đồ dùng trong xe ô tô